Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1087.
do enact as follows:SB1087,11Section 1. 799.01 (1) (cr) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1087,2,52799.01 (1) (cr) Third-party complaints, personal injury claims, and tort 3claims. Third-party complaints, personal injury claims, and actions based in tort, 4where the amount claimed is $5,000 or less, unless the action is under s. 947.016 5(4).SB1087,26Section 2. 947.016 of the statutes is created to read:SB1087,2,87947.016 Disrupting access to a reproductive health service facility or 8place of religious worship. (1) Definitions. In this section: SB1087,2,119(a) “Facility” includes a hospital, clinic, physician’s office, or other facility that 10provides reproductive health services and includes the building or structure in 11which the facility is located.SB1087,2,1212(b) “Interfere” means to restrict a person’s freedom of movement.SB1087,3,213(c) “Physical obstruction” means rendering impassable ingress to or egress 14from a facility that provides reproductive health services or a place of religious 1worship, or rendering passage to or from such a facility or place of religious worship 2unreasonably difficult or hazardous.SB1087,3,63(d) “Reproductive health services” means any medical, surgical, counseling, or 4referral services relating to the human reproductive system, including services 5relating to pregnancy or the termination of a pregnancy, that are provided in a 6hospital, clinic, physician’s office, or other facility.SB1087,3,87(2) Prohibited actions. A person who does any of the following may be 8penalized as provided in sub. (3):SB1087,3,119(a) By force or threat of force or by physical obstruction, intentionally injures, 10intimidates, or interferes with any person because that person is or has been 11obtaining or providing reproductive health services.SB1087,3,1412(b) By force or threat of force or by physical obstruction, intentionally injures, 13intimidates, or interferes with any person in order to prevent that person from 14obtaining or providing reproductive health services.SB1087,3,1615(c) Intentionally damages or destroys the property of a facility because the 16facility provides reproductive health services.SB1087,3,2117(d) By force or threat of force or by physical obstruction, intentionally injures, 18intimidates, or interferes with any person lawfully exercising or seeking to exercise 19the right of religious freedom at a place of religious worship under the First 20Amendment to the U.S. Constitution and article I, section 18, of the Wisconsin 21Constitution.SB1087,3,2322(e) Intentionally damages or destroys the property of a place of religious 23worship.SB1087,3,2424(3) Penalties. A person who violates sub. (2) is guilty of the following:SB1087,4,11(a) For a first violation, a Class A misdemeanor.SB1087,4,22(b) For a 2nd or subsequent violation, a Class I felony.SB1087,4,153(4) Civil remedies. (a) Any person aggrieved by conduct that is prohibited 4under sub. (2) who is a person involved in providing or seeking to provide, or 5obtaining or seeking to obtain, services in a facility that provides reproductive 6health services, or who is a person lawfully exercising or seeking to exercise the 7right of religious freedom at a place of religious worship under the First 8Amendment to the U.S. Constitution and article I, section 18, of the Wisconsin 9Constitution, or the entity that owns or operates the place of religious worship, may 10bring a civil action for appropriate relief, including temporary or permanent 11injunctive relief, compensatory and punitive damages, and, notwithstanding the 12limitations of s. 799.25 or 814.04, all actual costs of the action, including reasonable 13attorney fees. With respect to compensatory damages, the plaintiff may elect, at 14any time prior to the rendering of final judgment, to recover, in lieu of actual 15damages, an award of statutory damages in the amount of $5,000 per violation.SB1087,4,2216(b) The attorney general or any district attorney, if he or she has reasonable 17cause to believe that any person or group of persons is being, has been, or may be 18injured by conduct constituting a violation of sub. (2), may bring a civil action under 19par. (a), and the court may award appropriate relief, including temporary or 20permanent injunctive relief, and compensatory damages to persons aggrieved as 21described under par. (a). The court, to vindicate the public interest, may also assess 22civil forfeitures as follows against each respondent:SB1087,4,24231. If the violation of sub. (2) was a first violation and it was a nonviolent 24physical obstruction, $10,000.SB1087,5,212. If the violation of sub. (2) was a first violation other than a nonviolent 2physical obstruction, $15,000.SB1087,5,433. If the violation of sub. (2) was a 2nd or subsequent violation and it was a 4nonviolent physical obstruction, $15,000.SB1087,5,654. If the violation of sub. (2) was a 2nd or subsequent violation other than a 6nonviolent physical obstruction, $25,000.SB1087,5,77